Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-395
Actions; prosecution and defense; duties of Attorney General and county attorneys.

In all proceedings instituted in any court, or otherwise, under the provisions of this chapter, it shall be and hereby is made the duty of the Attorney General, and of the several county attorneys throughout the state, to prosecute or defend all such proceedings, when requested by the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 145, p. 469;

R.S.1913, § 3282;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XI, § 10, p. 650;

C.S.1922, § 7889;

C.S.1929, § 44-1110;

R.S.1943, § 44-395.